Nevada, session 83, AB291.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. NRS 179.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.295 1. The person who is the subject of the records that
are sealed pursuant to NRS 34.970, 174.034, 176.211, 176A.245,
176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259,
179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or 453.3365 may petition the court that
-
*AB291_R1*

– 2 –
ordered the records sealed to permit inspection of the records by a
person named in the petition, and the court may order such
inspection. Except as otherwise provided in this section, subsection
9 of NRS 179.255 and NRS 179.259 and 179.301, the court may not
order the inspection of the records under any other circumstances.
2. If a person has been arrested, the charges have been
dismissed and the records of the arrest have been sealed, the court
may order the inspection of the records by a prosecuting attorney
upon a showing that as a result of newly discovered evidence, the
person has been arrested for the same or a similar offense and that
there is sufficient evidence reasonably to conclude that the person
will stand trial for the offense.
3. The court may, upon the application of a prosecuting
attorney or an attorney representing a defendant in a criminal action,
order an inspection of such records for the purpose of obtaining
information relating to persons who were involved in the incident
recorded.
4. [This section does not prohibit a court from considering a
proceeding for which records have been sealed pursuant to NRS
174.034, 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245,
179.247, 179.255, 179.259, 179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or
453.3365 in] In determining whether to grant a petition pursuant to
NRS 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245, 179.255,
179.259, 179.2595 or 453.3365 for a conviction of another offense
[.] , the court shall not consider a proceeding for which records
have been sealed pursuant to NRS 174.034, 176.211, 176A.245,
176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259,
179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or 453.3365.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a
petition for the sealing of a record that is filed on or after October 1,
2025.
H
-
*AB291_R1*